Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1409
Labor on roads; wages fixed by county board.

Any person performing labor on roads shall receive the wages fixed by the county board in each county for such labor.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. I, § 9, p. 511.